Utah statutes.
59-12-2213.   County, city, or town option sales and use tax to fund a system for public transit -- Base -- Rate.

(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this part, a county, city, or town may impose a sales and use tax under this section of up to:

(a)  for a county, city, or town other than a county, city, or town described in Subsection (1)(b), .25% on the transactions described in Subsection 59-12-103(1) located within the county, city, or town to fund a system for public transit; or

(b)  for a county, city, or town within which a tax is not imposed under Section 59-12-2216, .30% on the transactions described in Subsection 59-12-103(1) located within the county, city, or town, to fund a system for public transit.

(2)  Notwithstanding Section 59-12-2208, a county, city, or town legislative body is not required to submit an opinion question to the county's, city's, or town's registered voters in accordance with Section 59-12-2208 to impose a sales and use tax under this section if the county, city, or town imposes the sales and use tax under Section 59-12-2216 on or before July 1, 2011.



Amended by Chapter 223, 2011 General Session

